California statutes. Public Resources Code
(c) If the board determines that the conditions in paragraphs (1) and (2) are met, the board shall enter into a contract, or other legally binding agreement, with one or more trade associations representing manufacturers of resin, manufacturers of rigid plastic packaging containers, or manufacturers of products packaged in rigid plastic packaging containers subject to this section and Section 42310.1. The agreement shall allow the trade association, in lieu of those individual manufacturers in the trade association who elect to be a party to the contract or agreement, to submit the report required pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 42310.1 and to implement the actions identified in the report. The board shall enter into the agreement only if both of the following conditions exist:

(1) The agreement ensures that the report will contain sufficient information that otherwise would be required to be submitted by individual manufacturers pursuant to Section 42310.1, and any other information that is necessary and directly related to the board’s ability to comply with this section.

(2) The agreement ensures that each manufacturer that elects to be a party to the agreement and that is a member of the trade association that submits the report shall be liable for the full amount of any civil penalties that may be imposed or shall comply with any requirement imposed by the board pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (b), as selected by the manufacturer. A manufacturer subject to this paragraph shall not be liable for a civil penalty greater than one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000), regardless of the number of trade associations of which the manufacturer is a member.

(d) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, a trade association representing resin manufacturers shall be responsible for submitting an additional report as provided pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 42310.1. The resin manufacturer’s trade association is subject to the review, penalties, and sanctions specified in paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (b). No member of the resin manufacturer’s trade association is liable for penalties and sanctions set forth in paragraph (1) or (2) of subdivision (b) pursuant to this subdivision if that member would not otherwise be subject to those penalties and sanctions.

(e) For the purposes of subdivision (b) and paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 42310.1, “feasible” means capable of being accomplished in a successful manner within a reasonable period of time, taking into account economic, environmental, social, and technological factors.

(f) For purposes of Section 42310.1 and this section regarding all reporting, compliance, and penalty obligations, “manufacturer” includes all subsidiaries and affiliates.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 561, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

42310.3.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 42310, a manufacturer is in compliance with this chapter if the manufacturer demonstrates through its own actions, or the actions of another company under the same corporate ownership, that one of the following actions were taken during the same period for which the manufacturer is subject to this chapter, with regard to a rigid plastic packaging container that stores the manufacturer’s product that is sold or intended for sale in this state:

(1) The manufacturer, or another company under the same corporate ownership, consumed postconsumer material generated in the state in the manufacture of a rigid plastic packaging container subject to Section 42310, or a rigid plastic packaging container or other plastic products or plastic packaging not subject to that section, and that is equivalent to, or exceeds the postconsumer material that the rigid plastic packaging container is otherwise required to contain, as specified in subdivision (a) of Section 42310.

(2) The manufacturer, or any company under the same corporate ownership, arranged by contractual agreement for the purchase and consumption of postconsumer material generated in the state and exported to another state for the manufacture of a rigid plastic packaging container subject to Section 42310, or a rigid plastic packaging container or other plastic products or plastic packaging not subject to that section that is equivalent to, or exceeds the postconsumer material that the rigid plastic packaging container is otherwise required to contain, as specified in subdivision (a) of Section 42310.

(b) The board shall determine the manner of demonstrating compliance with this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 130, Sec. 215.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Penalties, Regulations, and Report [42320. - 42327.]

42320.

Any entity required to make a certification pursuant to this chapter may be audited by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 769, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

42321.

If any entity provides the board with a false or misleading certificate pursuant to this chapter, the board, within 30 days of making this determination, shall refer the provider of the false or misleading certificate to the Attorney General for prosecution for fraud.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 769, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

42321.5.

(a) A container manufacturer who sells a rigid plastic packaging container to a manufacturer and who submits a certification to the manufacturer, for purposes of this chapter, shall not provide any false or misleading information. A container manufacturer who submits to a manufacturer a certification with false or misleading information is subject to the same penalties and fines that are imposed upon a manufacturer that does not comply with Sections 42321 and 42322.

(b) Notwithstanding Sections 42321 and 42322, a manufacturer is not subject to any fine or penalty for not complying with this chapter as a result of the submittal of false or misleading information by a container manufacturer to the manufacturer with regard to a container sold to that manufacturer.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 666, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

42322.

(a) Any violation of this chapter is a public offense punishable by a fine of not more than one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000).

(b) In addition to the penalty specified under subdivision (a), any violation of this chapter may be subject to a civil penalty assessed by the board of not more than fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) for each violation, pursuant to a notice and hearing procedure that conforms with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(c) The total annual fines or penalties assessed upon a violator of this chapter shall not exceed one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000).

(d) The board shall annually publish a list by July 1 setting forth any fines or penalties that have been levied against a violator of this chapter in the preceding calendar year, for failure to comply with the requirements of this chapter.

(e) The board shall deposit all penalties or fines paid pursuant to this section into the Rigid Container Account, which is hereby created in the Integrated Waste Management Fund in the State Treasury. The moneys deposited in the Rigid Container Account shall be expended by the board, upon appropriation by the Legislature, to assist local governmental agencies to develop and implement collection and processing systems for the recycling of materials that are subject to this chapter, for the development of markets for these materials, and for the board’s costs of implementing this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 406, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

42323.

Proprietary information included in part of a report or certificate submitted to the board pursuant to this chapter shall not be made available to the general public.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 769, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

42325.

The board shall adopt regulations to implement this chapter. These regulations shall include, but shall not be limited to, all of the following:

(a) Procedures for certifying compliance with Article 2 (commencing with Section 42310), including a requirement that product manufacturers include in their specifications for rigid plastic packaging containers a requirement that the packaging manufacturer certify that the rigid plastic packaging containers comply with this chapter. 

(b) Procedures for considering and granting waivers pursuant to Article 4 (commencing with Section 42330).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 561, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

42326.

In developing the regulations required by Section 42325, the board shall consult with representatives of the manufacturers affected by this chapter, with representatives of environmental organizations, and other interested parties.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 561, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

42327.

The board may expend funds from the Integrated Waste Management Account to implement this chapter, upon appropriation by the Legislature.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 769, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Waivers [42330. - 42330.]

42330.

(a) The board shall grant a waiver from the postconsumer material content requirement of subdivision (a) of Section 42310, but not from any other requirement of Section 42310, if the board finds one or more of the following:

(1) The rigid plastic packaging containers cannot meet the postconsumer material requirements of subdivision (a) of Section 42310 and remain in compliance with applicable provisions of regulations adopted by the Food and Drug Administration or other state or federal laws or regulations.

(2) It is technologically infeasible to use rigid plastic packaging containers that achieve the postconsumer material requirement of subdivision (a) of Section 42310.

(b) The board shall grant a waiver from all of the requirements of Section 42310 if the board finds either of the following:

(1) Less than 60 percent of the single-family homes in the state on and after January 1, 1994, have curbside collection programs that include beverage container recycling.

(2) At least 50 percent, by number, of a manufacturer’s rigid plastic packaging containers sold or offered for sale in the state in the current calendar year achieve the postconsumer material requirements of subdivision (a) of Section 42310 and all of the manufacturer’s rigid plastic packaging containers will comply with the requirements of Section 42310 on or before January 1, 1996.

(c) The board shall grant a one-year waiver from all of the requirements of Section 42310 for products packaged in rigid plastic packaging containers that are introduced and sold in this state after January 1, 1995.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 183, Sec. 302.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Exemptions [42340. - 42345.]

42340.

The following rigid plastic packaging containers are exempt from this chapter:

(a) Rigid plastic packaging containers produced in or out of the state which are destined for shipment to other destinations outside the state and which remain with the products upon that shipment.

(b) Rigid plastic packaging containers which contain drugs, medical devices, cosmetics, food, medical food, or infant formula as defined by the Federal Food, Drug and Cosmetic Act (21 U.S.C. Sec. 301 et seq.).

(c) Rigid plastic packaging containers which contain toxic or hazardous products regulated by the Federal Insecticide, Fungicide, and Rodenticide Act (7 U.S.C. Sec. 136 et seq.).

(d) Rigid plastic packaging containers which are manufactured for use in the shipment of hazardous materials and are prohibited from being manufactured with used material by federal packaging material specifications set forth in Sections 178.509 and 178.522 of Title 49 of the Code of Federal Regulations, or are subject to testing standards set forth in Sections 178.600 to 178.609, inclusive, of Title 49 of the Code of Federal Regulations, or to which recommendations of the United Nations on the transport of dangerous goods are applicable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 754, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

42345.

Any extension of time for manufacturers to comply with Section 42310, beyond that which is granted pursuant to Section 42310.1 for the rigid plastic packaging containers described in that section, shall only be enacted by a statute passed by a two-thirds vote of both houses of the Legislature.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1062, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5.6. Plastic Ring Devices [42350. - 42350.]

42350.

(a) For the purposes of this section, “degradable” means all of the following:

(1) Biodegradation, photodegradation, chemodegradation, or degradation by other natural degrading processes, as defined by the American Society of Testing Materials.

(2) Degradation at a rate that meets the requirements of Part 238 (commencing with Section 238.10) of Subchapter H of Chapter I of Title 40 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(3) Degradation that, as attested by the manufacturer of the device, will not produce or result in a residue or byproduct that, during or after the process of degrading, would be a hazardous or extremely hazardous waste identified pursuant to Chapter 6.5 (commencing with Section 25100) of Division 20 of the Health and Safety Code.

(b) Except as provided in subdivision (c), no container shall be sold or offered for sale at retail in this state that is connected to any other container by means of a plastic ring or similar plastic device that is not degradable when disposed of as litter.

(c) This section does not apply to devices that do not contain an enclosed hole or circle of more than one and one-half inches in diameter or that do not contain a hole.

(d) Any person who sells at wholesale or distributes to a retailer for sale at retail in this state containers that are connected to each other in violation of subdivision (b) is guilty of an infraction and shall be punished by a fine not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 17, Sec. 122.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5.7. Products [42355. - 42358.5.]

42355.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) Littered plastic products have caused and continue to cause significant environmental harm and have burdened local governments with significant environmental cleanup costs.

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature to
 ensure that environmental marketing claims, including claims of biodegradation, do not lead to an increase in environmental harm associated with plastic litter by providing consumers with a false belief that certain plastic products are less harmful to the environment if littered.

(c) A product’s ability to biodegrade is a function of both the physical and chemical makeup of the product as well as the environmental conditions to which it is subject.

(d) Use of the term “degradable,” “biodegradable,” “decomposable,” or other like terms on plastic products is inherently misleading unless the claim includes a thorough disclaimer providing necessary qualifying details, including, but not limited to, the environments and timeframes in which the claimed action will take place.

(e) Given the complex nature of biodegradation
 and the fact that most plastic products will travel through multiple environments from the time of manufacture to the time of final disposition, and given the intrinsic constraints of marketing claims, including the space on the plastic product, there is no reasonable ability for plastic product manufacturers to provide an adequate disclaimer qualifying the use of these and like terms without relying on an established scientific standard specification for the action claimed.

(f) Given these and other constraints, and the significant environmental harm that is caused by plastic litter, the use of these terms must be prohibited unless, or until the time as there is established, an American Society for Testing and Materials (ASTM) standard specification for the term claimed that has been approved by the Legislature.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 2) and added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 594, Sec. 1.   (SB 567)   Effective January 1, 2012.   Section operative January 1, 2013, pursuant to Section 42358.5.)
-------------------------------------------

42355.5.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares that it is the public policy of the state that environmental marketing claims, whether explicit or implied, should be substantiated by competent and reliable evidence to prevent deceiving or misleading consumers about the environmental impact of plastic products. For consumers to have accurate and useful information about the environmental impact of plastic products, environmental
 marketing claims should adhere to uniform and recognized standards, including those standard specifications established by the American Society for Testing and Materials.

(b) The Legislature further finds and declares that it is the public policy of the state that claims related to the recyclability of a product or packaging be truthful in practice and accurate. Consumers deserve accurate and useful information related to how to properly handle the end of life of a product or packaging.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 507, Sec. 4.   (SB 343)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

42355.51.

(a) A person shall not offer for sale, sell, distribute, or import into the state any product or packaging for which a deceptive or misleading claim about the recyclability of the product or packaging is made.

(b) (1) Subject to paragraph (2), a product or packaging that displays a chasing arrows symbol, a chasing arrows symbol
 surrounding a resin identification code, or any other symbol or statement indicating the product or packaging is recyclable, or otherwise directing the consumer to recycle the product or packaging, is deemed to be a deceptive or misleading claim pursuant to this section and Section 17580.5 of the Business and Professions Code unless the product or packaging is considered recyclable in the state pursuant to subdivision (d) and is of a material type and form that routinely becomes feedstock used in the production of new products or packaging.

(2) Paragraph (1) does not apply to either of the following:

(A) Any product or packaging that is manufactured up to 18 months after the date the department publishes the first material characterization study required pursuant to subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (d), or before January 1, 2024, whichever is later.

(B) Any product or packaging manufactured up to 18 months after the date the department updates the material characterization study pursuant to subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (d), if the product or packaging satisfied or, for a new product or packaging, would have satisfied, the requirements to be considered recyclable in the state pursuant to subdivision (d) before the publication of the updated study.

(3) Subject to paragraph (2), for a product or packaging that is not considered to be recyclable in the state pursuant to subdivision (d), all of the following apply:

(A) Displaying a chasing arrows symbol or any other statement indicating the product is recyclable directly on the product shall be deemed to be deceptive or misleading pursuant to this section and Section 17580.5 of the Business and
 Professions Code.

(B) If a product or packaging has multiple material types, a chasing arrows symbol or statement indicating recyclability may be displayed on the external packaging that is considered to be recyclable in the state pursuant to subdivision (d) if the chasing arrows symbol or statement makes clear in the same or greater font, font size, or symbol size which other components of the product or packaging are not recyclable.

(C) Displaying a chasing arrows symbol or any other statement indicating recyclability on packaging containing a consumable product shall, for purposes of this section, be deemed to refer only to the packaging. For purposes of this subparagraph, “consumable product” means a commodity that is intended to be used and not disposed of.

(c) For purposes of this section, the following do not
 constitute a deceptive or misleading claim about the recyclability of the product or packaging pursuant to this section or Section 17580.5 of the Business and Professions Code:

(1) A person using a chasing arrows symbol in combination with a clearly visible line placed at a 45-degree angle over the chasing arrows symbol to convey that an item is not recyclable.

(2) A consumer good that is required by any federal or California law or regulation to display a chasing arrows symbol, including, but not limited to, Section 103(b)(1) of the federal Mercury-Containing and Rechargeable Battery Management Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 14322(b)(1)) and Section 25215.65 of the Health and Safety Code.

(3) Directing a consumer to compost or properly dispose of a consumer good through an organics recycling program.

(4) A resin identification code placed inside a solid equilateral triangle.

(d) (1) On or before January 1, 2024, in order to provide information to the public sufficient for evaluating whether a product or packaging is recyclable in the state according to the criteria set forth in paragraph (2) and is of a material type and form that routinely becomes feedstock used in the production of new products or packaging, the department shall do both of the following:

(A) (i) Update the regulations promulgated pursuant to Section 41821.5 to include both of the following in the information to be submitted to the department pursuant to that section:

(I) How the material collected or processed by the operations and
 facilities was collected.

(II) What material types and forms are actively recovered, and not considered contaminants, by the operation or facility.

(ii) The department shall publish the information required pursuant to clause (i) in a form the department deems appropriate for achieving the purpose of this section consistent with the requirements of paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 41821.5.

(B) (i) To get a representative sample of recycling programs in the state, the department shall conduct and publish on its internet website a characterization study of material types and forms that are collected, sorted, sold, or transferred by solid waste facilities deemed appropriate by the department for inclusion in the study. The department’s activities pursuant to this subparagraph, including
 the department’s determination of the appropriate facilities to include in the study, are exempt from the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).

(ii) The department shall update the material characterization study required pursuant to this subparagraph every five years, with the first update being issued by the department in 2027.

(iii) Notwithstanding clauses (i) and (ii), the department may publish additional information that was not available at the time of the most recent periodic material characterization study regarding the appropriate characterization of material types and forms.

(iv) For purposes of studying a representative sample of material types and forms in the state, within 90 days of a department request, a
 facility shall allow for periodic sampling conducted by a designated representative of the department on a mutually-agreed upon date and time. The department shall not request a periodic sampling of a facility if that facility was sampled during the previous 24 months.

(v) For each material characterization study conducted pursuant to this subparagraph, the department shall publish on its internet website the preliminary findings of the study and conduct a public meeting to present the preliminary findings and receive public comments. The public meeting shall occur at least 30 days after the department publishes the preliminary findings. After receiving and considering public comments, and within 60 days of the public meeting, the department shall finalize and publish on its internet website the findings of the study.

(2) Subject to paragraph (3), a product or packaging is
 considered recyclable in the state if, based on information published by the department pursuant to subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1), the product or packaging is of a material type and form that meets both of the following requirements:

(A) The material type and form is collected for recycling by recycling programs for jurisdictions that collectively encompass at least 60 percent of the population of the state.

(B) (i) The material type and form is sorted into defined streams for recycling processes by large volume transfer or processing facilities, as defined in regulations adopted pursuant to Section 43020, that process materials and collectively serve at least 60 percent of recycling programs statewide, with the defined streams sent to and reclaimed at a reclaiming facility consistent with the requirements of the Basel Convention.

(ii) The department may adopt regulations modifying this requirement to encompass transfer or processing facilities other than large volume transfer or processing facilities, as the department deems appropriate for achieving the purposes of this section.

(3) A product or packaging shall not be considered recyclable in the state unless the product or packaging meets all of the following criteria, as applicable:

(A) For plastic packaging, the plastic packaging is designed to not include any components, inks, adhesives, or labels that prevent the recyclability of the packaging according to the APR Design® Guide published by the Association of Plastic Recyclers.

(B) For plastic products and non-plastic products and packaging, the product or packaging is
 designed to ensure recyclability and does not include any components, inks, adhesives, or labels that prevent the recyclability of the product or packaging.

(C) The product or packaging does not contain an intentionally added chemical identified pursuant to the regulations implementing subparagraph (4) of subdivision (g) of Section 42370.2.

(D) The product or packaging is not made from plastic or fiber that contains perfluoroalkyl or polyfluoroalkyl substances or PFAS that meets either of the following criteria:

(i) PFAS that a manufacturer has intentionally added to a product or packaging and that have a functional or technical effect in the product or packaging, including the PFAS components of intentionally added chemicals and PFAS that are intentional breakdown products of an added chemical that also have a
 functional or technical effect in the product.

(ii) The presence of PFAS in a product or product component or packaging or packaging component at or above 100 parts per million, as measured in total organic flourine.

(4) Notwithstanding paragraphs (2) and (3), a product or packaging is recyclable in the state if the product or packaging has a demonstrated recycling rate of at least 75 percent, meaning that not less than 75 percent of the product or packaging sorted and aggregated in the state is reprocessed into new products or packaging.

(5) (A) Before January 1, 2030, notwithstanding paragraphs (2) and (3), a product or packaging not collected pursuant to a curbside collection program is recyclable in the state if the non-curbside collection program recovers at least 60 percent of the product
 or packaging in the program and the material has sufficient commercial value to be marketed for recycling and be transported at the end of its useful life to a transfer, processing, or recycling facility to be sorted and aggregated into defined streams by material type and form.

(B) After January 1, 2030, notwithstanding paragraphs (2) and (3), a product or packaging not collected pursuant to a curbside collection program is recyclable in the state if the non-curbside collection program recovers at least 75 percent of the product or packaging in the program and the material has sufficient commercial value to be marketed for recycling and be transported at the end of its useful life to a transfer, processing, or recycling facility to be sorted and aggregated into defined streams by material type and form.

(6) Notwithstanding paragraphs (2) and (3), a product or packaging is
 recyclable in the state if the product or packaging is part of, and in compliance with, a program established pursuant to state or federal law on or after January 1, 2022, governing the recyclability or disposal of that product or packaging if the director determines that the product or packaging will not increase contamination of curbside recycling or deceive consumers as to the recyclability of the product or packaging.

(7) The information published by the department pursuant to paragraph (1) shall not limit the discretion of a local agency under existing law to decide whether, and to what extent, a material type or form shall be accepted by a local recycling program.

(e) For purposes of this section, “chasing arrows symbol” has the meaning set forth in subdivision (f) of Section 17580 of the Business and Professions Code.

(f) Consistent with the waste hierarchy established pursuant to Section 40051, and pursuant to Section 40180, for purposes of this section, “recycling,” “recyclable,” and “recyclability” do not include transformation, as defined in Section 40201, EMSW conversion, or production of fuels.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 28, Sec. 141.   (SB 1380)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

42356.

For purposes of this chapter, the following definitions apply:

(a) “ASTM” means the ASTM International.

(b) (1) “ASTM standard specification” means either of the following:

(A) The ASTM Standard Specification for Labeling of
 Plastics Designed to be Aerobically Composted in Municipal or Industrial Facilities D6400, as published in 2019, except as provided in subdivision (c) of Section 42356.1.

(B) The ASTM Standard Specification for Labeling of End Items that Incorporate Plastics and Polymers as Coatings or Additives with Paper and Other Substrates Designed to be Aerobically Composted in Municipal or Industrial Facilities D6868, as published in 2019, except as specified in subdivision (c) of Section 42356.1.

(2) “ASTM standard specification” does not include an ASTM Standard Guide, a Standard Practice, or a Standard Test Method.

(c) “Department” means the Department of Resources Recycling and Recovery.

(d) “Director” means the Director of Resources Recycling and
 Recovery.

(e) “Manufacturer” means a person, firm, association, partnership, or corporation that produces a product.

(f) “OK compost HOME certification” means certification of conformity with the existing TUV Austria certification “OK compost HOME certification” which, as of January 1, 2011, uses European Norm 13432 standard adapted to low-temperature composting in accordance with the TUV Austria program “OK 2-Home Compostability of Products.”

(g) “Product” includes, but is not limited to, any of the following:

(1) (A) A consumer product.

(B) For purposes of this paragraph, “consumer product” means a product or part of a product that is used, bought, or leased for use
 by a person for any purpose.

(2) A package or a packaging component.

(3) A bag, sack, wrap, or other thin plastic sheet film product.

(4) A food or beverage container or a container component, including, but not limited to, a straw, lid, or utensil.

(h) “Supplier” means a person who does one or more of the following:

(1) Sells, offers for sale, or offers for promotional purposes a product.

(2) Takes title to a product, produced either domestically or in a foreign country, that is purchased for resale or promotional purposes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 504, Sec. 2.   (AB 1201)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

42356.1.

(a) If an ASTM standard specification specified in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 42356 is subsequently revised, the department shall review the new ASTM standard specification as follows:

(1) If the department determines that the new standard, when compared to the ASTM standard specification prior to its revision, is more stringent and more
 protective of public health, public safety, and the environment, and is reflective of and consistent with state policies and programs, the department may adopt the new standard.

(2) If the department determines that the new standard, when compared to the ASTM standard specification prior to its revision, is not as stringent and does not protect public health, public safety, and the environment, and is not reflective of and consistent with state policies and programs, the department shall not adopt the new standard.

(b) If the ASTM, or any other entity, develops a new standard specification or other applicable standard for any of the terms prohibited under subdivision (a) of Section 42357, the department may review the new standard and, if the department determines that the new standard for the prohibited term, when compared to the current ASTM standard in effect, is more stringent
 and more protective of public health, public safety, and the environment, and is reflective of and consistent with state policies and programs, the department may make a recommendation to the Legislature.

(c) Compliance with a standard adopted pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) shall be deemed to be in compliance with this chapter.

(d) Fiber products that are demonstrated to not incorporate any plastics or polymers, including, but not limited to, through lamination, extrusion, or mixing, are not required to comply with an ASTM standard specification pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 504, Sec. 3.   (AB 1201)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

42356.2.

The department may adopt an existing standard different from an ASTM standard specification, as described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 42356, if all the following conditions are met:

(a) The existing standard is adopted or developed by a standard-setting organization recognized by the department, including, but not
 limited to, the ASTM or another similar organization.

(b) The existing standard adds qualifications to an ASTM standard specification, as described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 42356, including, but not limited to, “home compostable.”

(c) The department determines that the existing standard is more stringent than the ASTM standard specification in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 42356 which that existing standard qualifies.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 594, Sec. 1.   (SB 567)   Effective January 1, 2012.   Section operative January 1, 2013, pursuant to Section 42358.5.)
-------------------------------------------

42357.

(a) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (3), a person shall not sell or offer for sale a product in this state that is labeled with the term “compostable” or “home compostable” unless, at the time of sale or offering for sale, the product meets the applicable ASTM standard specification, as specified in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 42356, or, if applicable, the product has OK compost
 HOME certification, as provided in paragraph (4).

(2) Compliance with only a section or a portion of a section of an applicable ASTM standard specification does not constitute compliance with paragraph (1).

(3) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), a person may sell or offer for sale a product in this state that is labeled with a qualified claim for a term specified in paragraph (1), if the product meets the relevant standard adopted by the department pursuant to Section 42356.2.

(4) (A) A product shall not be labeled with the term “home compostable” unless the manufacturer of that product holds OK compost HOME certification with regard to that product, except as provided in subparagraph (B) or (C).

(B) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), if
 the ASTM adopts a standard specification for the term “home compostable” on or before January 1, 2016, and the department determines that the ASTM standard specification is at least equal to, or more stringent than, the OK compost HOME certification, a product labeled with the term “home compostable” shall meet that ASTM standard specification. The department may also take the actions specified in Section 42356.1 with regard to an ASTM standard for home compostability.

(C) If the department adopts a standard pursuant to Section 42356.2, a product labeled with the term “home compostable” shall meet the standard adopted by the department and not the standard specified in subparagraph (A) or (B).

(b) (1) Except as provided in subdivision (a) or (f), a person shall not sell or offer for sale a product in this state that is labeled with the term “biodegradable,”
 “degradable,” or “decomposable,” or any form of those terms, or in any way implies that the product will break down, fragment, biodegrade, or decompose in a landfill or other environment.

(2) For purposes of this subdivision, “implies” includes, but is not limited to, using green, beige, or brown tinting or color schemes on a plastic precheckout or carryout bag that is not eligible to be labeled with the terms “compostable” or “home compostable” pursuant to this section.

(c) The director may issue guidelines, consistent with this chapter, for determining whether a product is not compliant with the labeling requirements of this section, and whether a product is designed, pigmented, or advertised in a manner that is misleading to consumers.

(d) A manufacturer or supplier, upon the request of a member of the public,
 shall submit to that member, within 90 days of the request, information and documentation demonstrating compliance with this chapter, in a format that is easy to understand and scientifically accurate.

(e) A product that is in compliance with this chapter shall not, solely as a result of that compliance, be deemed to be in compliance with any other applicable marketing requirement or guideline established under state law or by the Federal Trade Commission.

(f) (1) The department may adopt the European Committee for Standardization’s standard specification EN 17033:2018 entitled “Plastics—Biodegradable mulch films for use in agriculture and horticulture—Requirements and test methods” or may adopt a standard that is equivalent to, or more stringent than, that standard, as it read on January 1, 2020.

(2) A person may sell or offer for sale commercial agricultural mulch film labeled with the term “soil biodegradable” only if the department has adopted the standard specification, or an equivalent or more stringent standard, pursuant to paragraph (1) and the commercial agricultural mulch film is certified to meet both that specification and the ASTM standard specification for compostability.
